Georgia, session 2025_26, SB257.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
S. B. 257
- 1 -

25 LC 62 0113
15 SECTION 1.
16 Chapter 2 of Title 49 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to Department of
17 Human Services, is amended in Code Section 49-2-6, relating to powers and duties, by
18 revising subsection (a) as follows:
19 "(a) The department shall administer or supervise all county departments of the state as
20 provided in Article 1 of Chapter 3 of this title."
21 SECTION 2.
22 Chapter 3 of Title 49 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to county and
23 district departments, boards, and directors of family and children services, is amended by
24 designating Code Sections 49-3-1 through 49-3-9 as Article 1 and by adding a new article
25 to read as follows:
26 "ARTICLE 2
27 49-3-10.
28 As used in this article, the term:
29 (1) 'Affordable family housing' means:
30 (A) An owner occupied residential dwelling for which the annual mortgage payments,
31 taxes, homeowner's insurance premiums, and condominium or association fees, if any,
32 constitute no more than 30 percent of the median annual gross household income, as
33 determined by the division, for a household of the size that may occupy the dwelling
34 in the county where the dwelling is located; or
35 (B) A rented residential dwelling for which the annual rent and other associated fees
36 constitute no more than 30 percent of the median annual gross household income, as
37 determined by the division, for a household of the size that may occupy the dwelling
38 in the county where the dwelling is located.
S. B. 257
- 2 -

25 LC 62 0113
39 (2) 'Annual gross household income' means all wages and income received by each
40 member of a household from all sources, except those excluded by the division's rules
41 and regulations, in a calendar year.
42 (3) 'Division' means the Division of Family and Children Services of the Department of
43 Human Services.
44 (4) 'Eligible recipient' means a low-income person, a very low-income person, or an
45 eligible sponsor.
46 (5) 'Eligible sponsor' means an individual or entity that constructs, rehabilitates, or
47 otherwise makes affordable family housing available to the public.
48 (6) 'Homeless person' means an individual who is a resident of this state and who has no
49 reasonable access to either traditional or permanent housing which can be considered
50 safe, sanitary, decent, and affordable.
51 (7) 'Local government' means a county, municipal corporation, or consolidated
52 government.
53 (8) 'Low-income person' means a person who is living in a household that is located in
54 this state and that has an annual gross household income that exceeds 50 percent but does
55 not exceed 80 percent of the median annual gross household income, as determined by
56 the division, for households of the same size within the county where such household is
57 located and who has at least one minor dependent.
58 (9) 'Mortgage' means any indebtedness secured by a lien or security interest on a
59 residential dwelling that was incurred to pay for all or part of the purchase price of the
60 residential dwelling by the obligor or obligors of such indebtedness.
61 (10) 'Multifamily structure' means a building, other than a townhouse, that contains four
62 or more individual residential dwelling units, each of which is designed exclusively for
63 use and occupation by one family.
64 (11) 'Single-family residential dwelling' means:
S. B. 257
- 3 -

25 LC 62 0113
65 (A) A building that contains one residential dwelling unit and that is designed
66 exclusively for use and occupation by one family; or
67 (B) A townhouse.
68 (12) 'Townhouse' means an individual residential dwelling unit within a larger structure
69 that contains two or more attached residential dwelling units constructed in a row where
70 each residential dwelling unit is designed exclusively for use and occupation by one
71 family, is located on an individual lot or parcel, and shares at least one common wall with
72 an adjacent unit.
73 (13) 'Very low-income person' means:
74 (A) A person who is living in a household that is located in this state and that has an
75 annual gross household income that does not exceed 50 percent of the median annual
76 gross household income, as determined by the division, for households of the same size
77 within the county where such household is located and who has at least one minor
78 dependent; or
79 (B) A homeless person.
80 49-3-11.
81 (a) On and after January 1, 2026, any local government in this state is authorized, but not
82 required, to adopt and implement by ordinance or resolution an affordable family housing
83 assistance program in its respective jurisdiction in accordance with the provisions of this
84 article.
85 (b) Such affordable family housing assistance program shall award loans, grants,
86 guarantees, or other forms of financial assistance to eligible recipients for the sole purpose
87 of:
88 (1) Constructing or rehabilitating affordable family housing or otherwise making
89 affordable family housing available to the public; or
S. B. 257
- 4 -

25 LC 62 0113
90 (2) Offering assistance for payment of security deposits, first month's rent, and final
91 month's rent to low-income persons or very low-income persons.
92 49-3-12.
93 (a) Any local government that elects to establish an affordable family housing assistance
94 program pursuant to this article shall apply to the division for a certificate of approval. The
95 division shall, by rules and regulations, prescribe the form and manner of such application
96 for a certificate of approval.
97 (b) The division shall approve an application and issue a certificate of approval if the
98 division determines that the local government has adopted an ordinance or resolution
99 establishing an affordable family housing assistance program that complies with the
100 provisions of Code Section 49-3-13 and any rules or regulations promulgated by the
101 division pursuant to this article.
102 (c) After a certificate of approval has been issued to a local government pursuant to this
103 Code section, the division shall continue to monitor such local government's affordable
104 family housing assistance program to ensure its ordinance or resolution establishing the
105 program is still in effect and that such local government's actions are in conformance with
106 such ordinance or resolution.
107 49-3-13.
108 (a) A local government shall not be issued a certificate of approval by the division under
109 Code Section 49-3-12 unless such local government adopts an ordinance or resolution
110 establishing an affordable family housing assistance program pursuant to this article. Such
111 ordinance or resolution shall:
112 (1) Establish and maintain an affordable family housing assistance trust fund in
113 accordance with the provisions of Code Section 49-3-15;
S. B. 257
- 5 -

25 LC 62 0113
114 (2) Establish specific loans, grants, guarantees, or other forms of financial assistance that
115 will be made available to eligible recipients through the affordable family housing
116 assistance program. Such loans, grants, guarantees, or other forms of financial assistance
117 shall be consistent with the provisions of this article and any rules and regulations
118 promulgated by the division and be limited to awards that will:
119 (A) Result in the construction or rehabilitation of affordable family housing or
120 otherwise make affordable family housing available to the public; or
121 (B) Offer assistance for payment of security deposits, first month's rent, and final
122 month's rent to low-income persons or very low-income persons;
123 (3) Establish eligibility criteria and terms and conditions for any loans, grants,
124 guarantees, or other forms of financial assistance that will be made available through the
125 affordable family housing assistance program. Such eligibility criteria and terms and
126 conditions shall be consistent with the provisions of this article and any rules and
127 regulations promulgated by the division pursuant to this article;
128 (4) Designate to a committee, council, or department of the local government the
129 responsibility of implementing and administering the affordable family housing
130 assistance program. Such committee, council, or department of the local government
131 shall be given the authority to adopt rules and regulations that are necessary to carry out
132 its duties in administering the affordable family housing assistance program and that are
133 not inconsistent with the provisions of this article or the rules and regulations
134 promulgated by the division pursuant to this article; and
135 (5) Provide for any other matter as may be required by the rules and regulations
136 promulgated by the division pursuant to this article.
137 (b) Any ordinance or resolution adopted by a local government that establishes an
138 affordable family housing assistance program pursuant to this article shall not become
139 effective until such local government is issued a certificate of approval by the division
140 pursuant to Code Section 49-3-12.
S. B. 257
- 6 -

25 LC 62 0113
141 49-3-14.
142 (a) The division may revoke a certificate of approval issued to any local government
143 pursuant to Code Section 49-3-12 if the division determines that:
144 (1) The ordinance or resolution adopted by the local government establishing an
145 affordable family housing assistance program pursuant to this article is no longer in effect
146 or has been modified such that the ordinance or resolution no longer complies with the
147 provisions of Code Section 49-3-13;
148 (2) The local government's actions are not in conformance with the ordinance or
149 resolution establishing the affordable family housing assistance program pursuant to this
150 article; or
151 (3) The local government has failed to comply with the reporting obligations set forth
152 in Code Section 49-3-19.
153 (b) Upon the revocation of a certificate of approval pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code
154 section, the division shall notify the local government and the clerk of the superior court
155 of such revocation.
156 49-3-15.
157 (a) An affordable family housing assistance trust fund established and maintained by a
158 local government pursuant to this article shall be kept separate from all other moneys and
159 accounts of the local government.
160 (b) All moneys appropriated to or otherwise made available by a local government to fund
161 an affordable family housing assistance program adopted pursuant to this article shall be
162 placed into such affordable family housing assistance trust fund by the local government.
163 (c) Disbursements from such affordable family housing assistance trust fund shall only be
164 made by the local government to:
S. B. 257
- 7 -

25 LC 62 0113
165 (1) Fund a loan, grant, guarantee, or other form of financial assistance that is awarded
166 to an eligible recipient in accordance with the provisions of this article and the rules and
167 regulations adopted by the division; or
168 (2) Provide for the payment of the costs and expenses associated with the local
169 government's administration of the affordable family housing assistance program adopted
170 pursuant to this article.
171 49-3-16.
172 Any loans, grants, guarantees, or other forms of financial assistance offered by an
173 affordable family housing assistance program established pursuant to this article that are
174 intended to result in the construction or rehabilitation of affordable family housing or
175 otherwise make affordable family housing available to the public shall only be awarded to
176 eligible sponsors that contractually agree to use the proceeds of such assistance to:
177 (1) Construct, rehabilitate, or otherwise make available to the public multiple
178 single-family residential dwellings, each of which will constitute affordable family
179 housing, or one or more multifamily structures whose individual residential dwelling
180 units will constitute affordable family housing;
181 (2) Reserve at least 40 percent of such constructed or rehabilitated residential dwellings
182 for rent to low-income persons; and
183 (3) Reserve at least 20 percent of such constructed or rehabilitated residential dwellings
184 for rent to very low-income persons.
185 49-3-17.
186 Any affordable family housing assistance program established pursuant to this article that
187 offers assistance for payment of security deposits, first month's rent, and final month's rent
188 to low-income persons or very low-income persons shall only offer such assistance to
189 low-income persons or very low-income persons.
S. B. 257
- 8 -

25 LC 62 0113
190 49-3-18.
191 In addition to the provisions of this article, the division shall establish, through rules and
192 regulations, further terms, conditions, and restrictions of any assistance provided through
193 an affordable family housing assistance program established pursuant to this article that the
194 division determines are necessary to ensure that such assistance is appropriately and
195 efficiently awarded and utilized.
196 49-3-19.
197 (a) Each local government that establishes an affordable family housing assistance
198 program pursuant to this article shall annually file with the division a report specifying and
199 accounting for:
200 (1) All moneys deposited into and disbursed from the affordable family housing
201 assistance trust fund established and maintained pursuant to this article;
202 (2) All loans, grants, guarantees, or other forms of financial assistance awarded by the
203 local government through such program; and
204 (3) Such other information as may be required by the rules and regulations promulgated
205 by the division pursuant to this article.
206 (b) The division shall, by rules and regulations, specify the form and manner that the
207 annual report required under subsection (a) of this Code section shall be filed.
208 49-3-20.
209 (a) The division shall annually determine and publish on its website the median annual
210 gross household incomes in each county of this state for households that have between one
211 and eight persons. In making such determinations, the division may rely on data and
212 information provided by the United States Census Bureau, the United States Department
213 of Housing and Urban Development, the United States Department of Labor, the United
S. B. 257
- 9 -

25 LC 62 0113
214 States Department of Commerce, and any other source that the division determines is
215 accurate and reliable.
216 (b) The median annual gross household incomes for each county determined and published
217 by the division pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section shall be used to determine
218 whether individuals meet the definition of low-income persons or very low-income
219 persons.
220 49-3-21.
221 (a) The division shall promulgate all rules and regulations required by this article and any
222 further rules and regulations that are not inconsistent with the provisions of this article and
223 that the division deems necessary and proper to administer the provisions of this article.
224 (b) The initial rules and regulations governing affordable family housing assistance
225 programs established pursuant to this article shall be promulgated and adopted by the
226 division by October 1, 2025, after an opportunity has been provided for public comment.
227 (c) The rules and regulations promulgated by the division pursuant to this article shall be
228 subject to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the 'Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.'"
229 SECTION 3.
230 This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025.
231 SECTION 4.
232 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 257
- 10 -